


[But he was “holding onto” Riri wasn’t he……moreover his forehead is reddening. Even though he had such a “cute” face….his highness is a bit “quick to assume” and “tends to run out of control” but, at the bottom of it all he’s a “good child” so if possible I’d like it if you could “properly choose your opponents”…..]



She was completely aware that he was comforting himself with Riri, while being evaluated as cute as a man, having his bad points pointed out that his older sister continually noted, and furthermore being treated as a child. Randell’s knees suddenly gave out and he fell onto the ground on all fours.



[Ara~ra], Riri had a troubled smile but, Shizuku and the old men, [Please stop already, his highnesses life points are already at 0~!], seemed to be raising out bitter voices within themselves.



However, Kaori didn’t let up. She worried about Randell who suddenly fell and called out anxiously.



[Your highness, are you alright? As expected the spot where you were hit was too much….]



[……No, I’m not injured. Rather than that…..Kaori…….what does Kaori think about me?]



Randell who was covered in wounds, decisively heard Kaori’s feelings



[For his highness? Let’s see….sometimes I become envious of Riri. I also~ want a naughty younger brother like his highness]



[Gufu~…young, younger brother…..]



The bomb that was dropped with a smile gave additional damage to Randell. Shizuku and the old men were thinking, why would you purposely pour salt onto the wound like that! with a face that seemed to want to cry, it seemed that Randell’s eyes had no more strength to withstand it.



However, even if he’s small Randell is a man, he can’t afford to stop here. Over the past few days, he cried a lot from the news of his fathers death, was helped up by his mother and older sister, and had just sworn in front of the grave to be strong. Now that the king of this country was gone he needed to lead it, he can’t afford to be stopped by this level of pain!



[Then…..is that kind of guy good? What’s so good about that guy!]



Rendell stared and ~Ki’ed!~ at Hajime, it was as if he was appealing and implying, [Open your eyes Kaori! You should already know who’s better!].



Hajime firmly held onto Yue from behind as Randell stared at him. From Randell’s view, he was likely the worst person a woman could fall for.



However, Kaori’s reply was obvious…..



[Eh? wh, what’s with that your highness, suddenly….mo~u, it’s embarrassing. But…..fufu, let’s see. That person is the person I love. If you asked me what about him I liked then, everything, I guess…..fufu]



And, that gave the final blow to Randell.



Once again Randell looked down and trembled greatly while still on all fours. Although Kaori was worried and about to rubbed his back with her hand and call out to him, Randell suddenly got up and rejected Kaori’s hand as he bolted towards the entrance.



And, he turned around once he reached the door,



[I hate the likes of youuuuu!!!]



He cried out loud and ran off. As he left, the shining thing at the corner of his eyes probably wasn’t their imaginations. From a distance, [Ua~aaaaaan!!], it was not understood if it was a cry or a courageous shout but it was clearly heard. After Randell’s sudden escape, the dumbfounded old men, [Your highness~!], they shouted as they left the room to chase after Randell.



[……That’s youth for you]



[Hi~i, more like personal affairs…..you’ve made him cry]



[No, ma~a, that’s right but…..the one who dealt the finishing blow was Kaori right?]



[Ku, I can’t refute that…..]



Hajime muttered out as Randell’s first love dispersed like the petals of cherry blossoms and Shizuku added in a tsukkomi. Kaori was wondering what was going on and about to run after Randell but Ririana stopped her.



Ririana knew that sooner or later Randell’s first love would come to an end, she had intended to comfort her younger brother by sleeping together with him for tonight. Randell was someone who will soon become the King of this country. He should be able to shrug off one or two unrequited loves.



When Ririana firmly closed the door that was left open, she walked towards Hajime and them along with Kaori. It appears that, rather than chasing after Randell, it seemed like she had something to talk about with Hajime and them. Ririana took the seat next to Shizuku.



Kaori was…..locking arms in “hand to hand” against Yue while trying to sit on Hajime’s opposite knee which caused them to look like they were pro wrestling.



If it were her original body then, Kaori wouldn’t be able to stand up against Yue because she was able to strengthen her body through direct magic manipulation while Kaori was a support type, however, because of the apostle’s body she’s well able to compete now….more like she seems to be the one who was pushing.



[Kaori….You’ve become so strong….]



[No, Shizuku. Stop being impressed and stop them]



Ririana tsukkomied Shizuku who had a slightly lonely expression while making her remark. Since there was some shock when Kaori died once, Shizuku was slightly becoming a regrettable person when regarding Kaori. There’s no way they could have the classes number 1 person with the most common sense turn into a regrettable character so, Hajime gave Kaori a strong flick to the forehead which forced her to sit on the seat besides them.



[U~u, it’s unfair that it’s only Yue…..]



[……Fufu, I won’t give up Hajime’s knee]



[Ano~, I’d like to begin the talk soon but…..]



Ririana called out coyly. However no one paid any attention to her.



[Hajime-kun…..]



[Don’t look at me with those eyes, Kaori. You’re sitting next to me, isn’t it fine?]



[…..I guess it can’t be helped then. I’ll give you my hand]



[Eh? Really? Then, I want you to caress my cheeks just like how you do it for Yue. ……Or is it no good?]



[If it’s just that much then I don’t mind]



[Ehehe, thanks, Hajime-kun]



[I’ll wait then. Waiting should be fine right? Yes, I’ll wait no matter how long…..~gusu~]



Ririana who completely missed her timing to talk, [I, even though I’m a princess…..It’s like I’m air], with tears. Shizuku interviened as she couldn’t stand it any longer, and finally, Hajime and their pink barrier was removed. Was a bit of Kaori also a part of it? It seems to have been stronger than usual. Is it proof that Kaori’s single-minded pursuit was overcoming Hajime…..



[~Kohon~. Back to what I was saying, just as Nagumo-san asked I’ve spread the rumors about the truth of the churches teachings but….unexpectedly, it seems to be going rather well. As expected, Aiko-san, no, “Goddess of Fertility” seems to have been effective]



[I see. …..Ma~a, people will believe in what they want to believe in, people will naturally get taken in the more it dramatically shakes their hearts. I expected that they’d believe it all without any problems. All that’s left, is to wait to see the actual effects….there’s no knowing what’ll happen after all]



[…..That’s right. But, it’s still hard to believe. What we’ve believed for years have been nothing but a fantasy…..my individual stance aside, it’s inevitable that a panic will start in the public. As someone from the royal family, Nagumo-san’s proposal was a god send]



Ririana bowed and thanked Hajime with a complex expression. Shizuku leaned her neck to the side and and asked, [About what?].



What Hajime and Ririana were talking about was, an explanation for the head temple’s collapse to the people.



It’s not possible to keep it under wraps forever, the royal palace needed to explain it eventually. However, according to the truth, the “Ehito-sama” which everyone believed in only saw them on the level of being toys and was a bastard who loved war, because everyone in the head temple of the church were a bunch of fanatics, they were all blown up to bits! If that was said it would only cause a panic to occur.



There, Hajime prepared a draft to explain the details and asked Ririana to explain it to the people based on what he had written on it.



It’s contents were, reason, an evil god who wished for a war had brainwashed the church members and caused the Kingdom to be invaded. Reason, Aiko who was sent by god was anxious of the situation and fought voluntarily. Reason, the church members risked their lives and fought along with god’s apostles and died as martyrs in the end. Reason, In order to protect the Kingdom, Aiko’s sword of light poured down, is what it said.



It’s not true but it’s not a lie either. It was roughly correct.



With that, Aiko as the “Goddess of Fertility” will further, “The evil god may have used Ehito-sama’s name, for our own sakes, the true god that we believe in we shouldn’t be something that we automatically believe in, we must become humans who are able to think for ourselves and decide when to take action for god. What’s right? You must act upon your own judgement. That is what our true god believes in, and for those of the church who died as martyrs” have that kind of speech later at the memorial ceremony.



In other words, Hajime created a false “Evil Ehito” who was mistaken for the true “Good Ehito”, the “Goddess of Fertility”’s speech will be the wedge which will plant recognition into the people’s hearts. Even if Ehito’s name was being talked about, whether it was the “Evil Ehito” or the “Good Ehito” wouldn’t be distinguishable by the people, which would in turn make them think about what they should really believe in themselves.



This way, they’re able to suppress the public panic of telling the truth that everything that they’ve believed from when they were born was nothing more than a fantasy, and also, it may become a source of resistance against god in the future……it’s only a possibility though.



[I see now…..Nagumo-kun is actually thinking about a lot of various things huh. The talk about god too, leaving it up to Ai-chan to tell the story, and about todays things….]



[Did you mistaken me for some kind of muscle for brains or something? Ma~a, I thought of it on the spot, since it doesn’t take much time or effort I decided to do it just this once, although we laid down the foundations…..]



[fufu, I didn’t particularly think you were a muscle for brains. I’m saying that you’re reliable. Just accept it as a complement]



Hajime shrugged his shoulders towards Shizuku’s words. Shizuku glanced at such a reliable Hajime. Somehow the exchanges dispositions were shown, Yue and Kaori were both piercing their eyes onto Shizuku. Shizuku who noticed suddenly began to shake, [Eh, what? What is it?], she asked Yue and them.



[Yue, what do you think?]



[……N, it’s still fine. It’s still at the friend level]



[Right. “still” huh]



[……N. We need to be cautious]



Yue and Kaori were whispering to each other as they consulted about something. It made Shizuku feel extremely discomfortable. And Ririana became air once again.



Hajime looked at Yue and them with an amazed expression as if saying, what are you guys talking about?





Chapter 110




Evening.



The red sky was spreading, peoples shadows were growing thin as it stretched, the shadow of a person stood still in front of a huge stone monument made from the stones from the mountain range at the northwest of the royal palace.



[I’m sorry….]



Right, the shadow of the person muttering was Aiko.



The monument towering in front of her, a so-called monument for the faithful who died in battle (A tower which symbolized praise to the souls who died while loyal to their country). It was for the people killed in action and victims who carried out their duties out of loyalty towards the Kingdom, their names were carved here without exception. Even now, there are lots of flower offerings and mementos left by people in front of the monument for those who have died.



Right now, although it’s unconfirmed how many people’s names were carved onto the stone but, Meld’s name will also be added onto here.



Aiko gently placed weapons within the mementos left behind. It was the damaged western sword and spear. It was the artifacts of Aiko’s students who passed away——Daisuke Hiyama and Reiichi Kondo.



Aiko voiced out her confession while alone, just what should I be conflicted with. That I wasn’t able to bring back Hiyama and them back to Japan, or, because one of my students caused many people to die, or, everything including what I’ve done……



While AIko was looking down with a dejected atmosphere, she remained standing as if she was enduring something, ~Za zaa~ footsteps resounded. The violently echoing sound was likely to purposely inform others of their own existence approaching. Usually he wouldn’t make such noises.



Aiko was startled and raised her face towards the sound.



[Nagumo-kun…..]



[What a coincidence, Sensei]



What was making that noise earlier was Hajime. His eyes were lightened up by the shine of the setting orange sun and stared right at Aiko. He had flowers in his hand. It’s obvious to understand that he was there to offer flowers as tributes. Aiko showed a slightly unexpected expression towards his actions.



Hajime noticed that Aiko’s expression and guessed that she was probably wondering what he was planning on doing, with a wry smile he placed the flowers onto the floral tribute stand.



[Even I feel like mourning for the dead people a bit, Sensei?]



[Eh? Ah, no, I mean, I don’t particularly……]



Hajime suddenly talked to Aiko in an unexpectedly regrettable voice which caused Aiko to be shaken and tried to deceive him by waving her hands back and forth in a hurry. Then Hajime shrugged his shoulders like it was a joke and stood silently by Aiko.



As Aiko frequently glanced at Hajime, it appeared that Hajime was looking up at the huge stone monument and didn’t particularly care about Aiko, he didn’t seem to have any signs of talking either. Somehow, silence suddenly fell into the area and Aiko decided to reluctantly start a conversation.



[Eh~tto, those flower are…..is it…..for Hiyama-kun and them?]



[There’s no way of that happening. It’s for Meld]



Hajime raised an eyebrow and plainly replied at the wrong guess.



[For Meld-san…..]



[Ahh, though we weren’t acquainted that much, I don’t particularly hate people of his nature. Contrary to his position, he worry quite a lot, failed a lot, and was always trying to improve himself…..although I’m only offering flowers its more along the feelings of “how regrettable” towards the people]



[Nagumo-kun…..that’s right huh….]



Towards Hajime’s words, Aiko’s expression suddenly turned gentle. Even though Hajime mercilessly killed his enemies, he still had the proper feelings to mourn for a person’s death so Aiko became happy at that. Her cheeks naturally loosened up that he purposely took the time to come and bring an offering.



Actually, Yue and them were taking a bath, he ran away when the women gave off a carnivorous glare in their eyes of wanting to take him into the bath room with them, since there was still time he became free, when he by chance glanced at the flowers being displayed in a vase, he thought, how about killing time by offering flowers? and he pulled some flowers from the vase but…..although his feelings about regret for Meld was real, he couldn’t actually tell the truth.



Hajime was taking in the circumstances of the surroundings and frowned at Aiko who loosened her cheeks.



[You’re not going to blame me…..]



[Eh?]



Towards Hajime’s sudden words, Aiko tilted her neck.



[That thing about Hiyama. The circumstances were different from Shimizu’s case. It appears that he was eaten by a demon in the end but, I was the one who pretty much killed him. I killed another of Sensei’s beloved students again? Kondo as well, although he was already dead, the one who pretty much destroyed his shape was me. …….I had thought that Sensei would have hit me once or twice out of anger]



[……….]



Aiko’s smile was erased and she looked down once again. Hajime was silent. He wasn’t pressing her for an answer. How much time was spent silently?……..Before long, Aiko began to gradually voice out her words.



[……To be honest, I can’t easily give out a clear answer. I don’t believe that it can be forgiven that Hiyama-kun killed Shirasaki-san but, if possible, I would have liked that he live out his life to atone for those sins. It was shocking that Kondo-kun turned out like that. But, I can understand why Nagumo-kun was enraged and showed your strength. An important person was killed in front of your eyes…..with that, although it’s against what I’d ideally want, you couldn’t do anything but vent out your anger on them. ……Besides, I don’t have the qualifications to blame Nagumo-kun]



Aiko crossed her arms and rubbed them both. It was as if her body was getting cold and she was trying to keep warm.



[Are you talking about what you did at the head temple?]



[……..]



A silent confirmation. Temporarily, although Aiko’s mind’s balance was broken, Hajime and Teio had somehow reverted it back to normal with reproduction magic, once again, it appears that her mind is being worn down by her sense of guilt and ethics. If you looked carefully under her eyes, you’d notice that she had dark circles that she tried to cover up with makeup, it was clear that she wasn’t able to sleep for the past several days. It’s possible that she was having nightmares.



Silence descended down once again. Hajime didn’t say anything and stood still. Was she unable to endure the atmosphere anymore? Aiko asked Hajime while lacking drive.



[……Is it……not painful for you Nagumo-kun?]



[Killing people? I don’t particularly think it’s painful……I think that that part of me probably broke when I fell into the abyss. That’s why I can’t sympathise with you]



[……..]



Towards Hajime’s words, Aiko’s face distorts in bitterness. Something important in Hajime was broken and, in a single strike, Aiko’s state of mind further tightened up.



[…..No one…..blames me]



[Eh?]



Aiko leaked out her voice as if she couldn’t endure it.



[No one blames me. The eyes of the children in our class doesn’t look at me any differently, as for the Kingdom’s citizens, they were looking at me with praise]



That was a fact. All classmates, had a strong impression from Hajime who was too gruesome in his battle, they didn’t really have much feelings about Aiko’s assistance in homicide, rather they were under the impression that Aiko fought for herself and took on the brunt of the load for their sakes, the Kingdom aristocrats and government officials were thankful that the brainwashing problem was solved.



[Though I’ve talked about it all to David-san and them, even they wanted a bit of time to think about and left it rather than immediately blaming me. Even though I robbed them of their important things]



Blood dripped from her lip that she bit. Aiko probably wanted to be blamed for it. The act of killing a person…..is heavy. As long as they’re not a maniac or rotten person, normally their minds would be hurt by the blades named guilt and ethics. So for such people, taking the blame and accepting the punishment, are in a sense a kind of salvation.



Aiko herself probably unconsciously seeked for that. However, that wasn’t given to her.



Although Hajime can agree that she played a part in overthrowing the church, he believed that even without Aiko, Teio would have still somehow managed to exterminate them someway or another, he thought that bearing the burden alone was a bit much, so as if he was troubled he scratched his cheek as he opened his mouth.



[Even if you say that, Sensei. The direct cause was due to Teio’s breath, Sensei only helped out a little? I don’t think you should take on the burden as if everything was your fault…..]



[Those kind of things don’t matter! I certainly……understood the possibility of them being killed but I still helped Teio-san. That’s no different than directly murdering them!]



Unexpectedly, Aiko gave out her rebuttal strongly. Aiko herself probably felt ashamed that she raised her voice as she shrank down apologetically. Looking at Aiko with a side glance, after a moment of silence, Hajime calmly asked.



[…..Do you regret it?]



[~……No, at that time, I was resolute with Teio-san…..because I couldn’t overlook what the church was doing….to help you…..if that was left alone then the students would surely have had terrible experiences…..that’s why…..]



While Aiko was holding back a painful voice, she replied that she “Had no regrets”.



At that time, when she looked at Ishtar and them who had cornered Hajime, not just for Hajime but also for the sake of her students to not have to fight, her resolution to dirty her hands was real. Even now that was still unshaken. However, she was suffering while carrying the people who she’s killed on her back, it wasn’t something that reasoning could solve.



Hajime let out a small sigh that wouldn’t be noticed by Aiko as he glanced towards the side at Aiko who looked like she was suffering. Why did a teacher like Aiko reveal such heavy feelings to a student like me. Even though I only came here to kill some time……he grieved in his mind.



And, suddenly, he recalled Aiko’s feelings that Yue and Shizuku pointed out earlier in the day and worried if that was the cause. It appears that Hajime was leaving Aiko’s student category in full-blast.



Hajime’s eyes were wandering around. He was completely looking for words.



[About Sensei, will you still be a Sensei from now on?]



[Eh?]



Towards Hajime’s abrupt question, Aiko’s expression unintentionally became blank. And she remembered that she was asked the same question once before. At that time, she should have answered with confidence, [Naturally!]



[…………..]



Now she was unable to immediately answer. That was because she questioned herself if she should declare herself as a teacher after having killed people. Aiko was tightly clenching her teeth and her expression distorted. He understood that Aiko was having an extreme conflict whirling within her mind.



As if he expected it, on behalf of Aiko who couldn’t answer, Hajime began to talk.



[If, Sensei says that she’ll continue being our Sensei from now on……will you listen to my selfishness as a student]



[Selfishness…..is it?]



Aiko who had a bad complexion and seemed to collapse at any moment, showed a perplexed expression from the words that came out of Hajime’s mouth.



[Yeah, my selfishness]



Hajime removed his sights from the monument while nodding and faced Aiko to match their eyes together. As she was being stared at Hajime, from somewhere within her, warmth was starting to well up and as if attracted by it Aiko also stared back.



After Hajime confirmed that he was firmly reflected in Aiko’s eyes, he slowly said his words. Exactly as Hajime said before, they were hopelessly selfish words.



[Sensei…..I want Sensei to feel guilty about it. I want you to shoulder it’s weight. Justly fighting, justly shouldering it, justly suffering, and justly complaining. To be human-like is slightly dazzling. I’m already unable to feel anything after all……you’ll be a good example for me to not forget my “Humanity”. So that’s why, continue shouldering it from now on. I’ll properly watch such a human-like Sensei after all. If I do so then even after I return to Japan, I’ll be able to live humanely]



[Nagumo-kun……]



Aiko’s eyes opened up widely towards Hajime’s words. She would have never thought in her dreams that he’d not blame her nor cheer her, but instead tell her to continue suffering from now on. But, towards that selfishness, in a sense, made her remember the shock which came from killing as it formed ominous clouds within Aiko’s heart.



The results of her determination and actions were serious. All the more it was painful as well. She wanted to run away and almost became broken. Her natural character made it extra painful because she was determined and resolute.



But, when she looked at herself, she had people who were willing to help her. The important things that were lost, there’s a person who can’t feel but remember them.



Aiko thought.



——Ahh, how very selfish. What mercilessly gentle selfishness



A transparent drop ran down Aiko’s cheeks. Everything she’s endured up until now in order to not cry easily crumbled.



As Aiko was shedding tears, Hajime averted his glance and turned his back as he troubled conveyed the his last words.



[Ma~a, times when it’s so painful that it seems like you’d break, by all means……since there’s no one here…..since there’s really~ no one here so it won’t be embarrassing……I’ll lend you my back]



[~….Really…..people like you are…..]



I’ll pretend that I didn’t notice that Aiko was crying? is what Hajime seemed to say as he showed his back, Aiko approached while smiling and crying and buried her face into his back.



[Then, I’ll be borrowing it for a bit. …..Nagumo-kun]



[Alright, Sensei]



Aiko’s cheeks loosened up because of Hajime’s casual answer and she entrusted her body. While shedding tears as if they were everything she’s saved up, she once again vowed. In other words, she’ll continue being a teacher. And continue shouldering her sins. If a selfish student would be watching her then…..she felt like she’ll be able to do her best.



The shadow of the two people expanded towards the east. As the night fell, the sounds of sobs resounded for a while.



After this, Hajime returned to the royal palace along with Aiko after she had finished crying but, while blushing randomly and looking down shamefully, Aiko was gracefully walking besides Hajime, to be honest, this may have done it……it goes without saying that he was breaking out in cold sweat.



And sure enough, Yue and them noticed and it’s needless to say what happened when he was taken into their room. About this case, Shia and them and i, Yue’s silent expressionless stare n particular was the most painful.



It should be noted, that they coincidentally met up with David and them of the temple knights as they returned to the royal palace but……it appears that, in the end their love for Aiko won.



To begin with, the reason why they accompanied Aiko as guards was due to various senses of values but, after being forcefully pulled away from Aiko when they returned to the Kingdom and was forced to descend the mountain without being confirming her safety made them start harboring doubt for the people of the church. Although they were considerably shocked when the truth of the church and god was revealed, as expected they still came to the conclusion that they couldn’t hate Aiko.



Although they kinda had a feeling of complete desperation hanging around them…..from now on, while believing in the “Goddess of Fertility”, they decided to revive and serve to protect the Kingdom as knights. Thinking about it again, it felt as if they carried a strange sublime feeling of love for Aiko but……surely they had lots of things to think about as well.



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



[Enough already, really geez! Ok!]



[Hajime-kun…..please be a bit more cautious?]



[Fufufu, as expected of master, to deliver the final blow after we just looked away for a moment….]



In the dining room of the royal palace, while eating dinner, Shia’s and their voices resounded out as if blaming something. Hajime who it was being directed at was just enjoying the meal in front of him as if it was someone elses problem.



Although Yue who was sitting to his right wasn’t saying anything, her eyes looked at him as if she was looking at a troublesome person. When they heard of the circumstances, [Ma~a, guess It couldn’t be helped then] is what they thought, clearly the feelings that Aiko has for Hajime inside of her was complex due to the fact that he was her student.



Moreover, after hearing Hajime’s stance of “neglecting” Aiko’s treatment, they somewhat harbored feelings of sympathy for Aiko.



[……Hajime. Does it seem like Aiko will be able to endure?]



Because they heard of the contents from Hajime, Yue was slightly worried and asked. As opposed to it, Hajime stopped eating and seemed to be thinking a little.



[N~, it’s not alright? Worst case scenario, if it looks too dangerous I’ll have to create an artifact to stabilize her mind using Spirit magic. Ma~a, even if we don’t worry about it, with time, that person will be able to digest it in neatly]



[……I see, that’s good]



As Yue’s eyes loosened up, Hajime also smiled.



[As expected of…..Yue-san. With just one step, she gets ahead by two]



[Is this…..the difference between her and me? Ku, I won’t lose! I won’t lose!]



[Umu, should it be called naturally or something….it was a technique which touched masters heart as if completely natural…..If I had to say it, it’s a godly skill. Obediently allow me to praise you]



[……Unwillingly evaluated]



Shia who was looking at her with a terrified expression, Kaori who looked mortified, and Teio who was feeling admiration. Yue’s expression became bitter after being unexpectedly evaluated. Hajime smiled wryly as he stroke Yue’s hair.



Among Hajime and his companions, in a sense as their feelings of getting along was firing up, an unexpected group came into the dining room. It was Kouki and them as well as his classmates. It appears that everyone including Aiko had come.



When Hajime looked at them for a moment, he frowned slightly. Beforehand, he heard of the times when they would be eating, he had thought that he would be able to comfortably eat with his companions but…..it appears that that plan was thrown off.



Ma~a, there’s no need to anxiously consider it, Hajime renewed his thoughts as he continued eating his meal. Yue and them didn’t particularly mind either.



But, it doesn’t appear that his classmates thought the same, some people thought it was rather interesting, some people felt slightly awkward, and some people were lost as to what to do and became restless. Although they frequently glanced over, they were reminded of Hajime’s previous statement that he didn’t see them as companions and much less held much interest in it, so they were hesitant to call out to him. By the way, Aiko was staring at Hajime for a different kind of reason.



[Ah~, Shizuku-chan! Over here!]



[Kaori. Can I sit next to you?]



[Of course]



Kaori was showing a friendly smile with Nointo’s cool face, Shizuku also naturally loosened her cheeks as she sat next to her.



At first It was still hard for the classmates to accept the fact that Kaori had changed her body but, the atmosphere of Kaori’s image and smile allowed them to loosen up. Even if her body has changed, Kaori’s peaceful atmosphere allowed her classmates hearts to relax. Or rather, when compared to the time when Hajime lost his cool, it was only slightly nerve wracking, there were many classmates who were glad that Kaori had returned.



*It’s funny cause the author didn’t mention Ryutaro here*When Shizuku sat on the seat, Kouki sat on the seat next to her, and Aiko sat on the opposite side, while Suzu sat next to aiko. Aiko was right next to Yue. The other classmates proceeded to sit on the other remaining seats. Suzu looked at Yue as she sat, [Excuse me…..for sitting besides Oneesama!], she said with a strangely tensed expression. Yue said, [……Why Oneesama?] while tilting her head.



When Kouki and them took their seats, the excellent maids of the royal palace began to move together and set the table. It was practically the same menu that Hajime and them had.



Then, at that time, over Yue’s head, Hajime and Aiko’s glances connected. At once, Aiko’s cheeks were lightly stained, she shamefully averted her eyes. Even still, she’d frequently glance back at Hajime, and secretly whispered out in a quiet voice.



[A, ano, Nagumo-kun…..sono, that thing from a while ago…..sono, if possible….]



Having to talk over Yue caused her to be a bit uncomfortable, most likely, as an adult, and, as a teacher, it was shameful to ask of Hajime so she kept quiet and decided to not say it.



Hajime guessed that Yue had decided to not mind it, and he thanked her within himself while looking at Aiko.



Suddenly her body was shaken and Aiko’s ears began to be dyed as well. There was a feeling that it was too late now that their eyes had matched up, Shizuku and them paid attention to Aiko’s appearance as she stared at Hajime. Fortunately, it was a blind spot for the other students so they weren’t found out but, the relatively close frontlines-group classmates saw it and were rather suspicious.



[About what, Sensei. Was there something?]



[Fu~e?]



Naturally Hajime had decided to pretend not to know anything. Aiko was momentarily dimmed by that attitude but, she guessed that he was willing to keep it a secret, with a wry smile, [No, it’s nothing], she answered. Although she was thinking that she was cowardly for having Hajime take care of it, she became happy and smiled because he was considerate.



When they saw Aiko’s state, more and more, the female’s began to turn their eyes onto Hajime. Only Yue was comforting Hajime by patting his shoulder, in addition, [Ah~n], as well. As expected of the true heroine. She was clearly different from the recent violent heroines of today.



Hajime was absorbed in his deep thoughts, as expected, Yue is the best lover! I don’t know how many times I’ve “fallen for her again”, Shia who sat on his opposite side began to tug on his sleeve.



[Hajime-san. Ah~n, desu]



It appears that rather than getting angry that her rivals in love seems to have increased, she judged that now seems to be the time for her to show her appeal. While blushing and glancing upwards, she gracefully presented a fork. At that point, she didn’t forget to also quietly draw her Usamimis closer to Hajime as well. She was wonderfully cunning.



Hajime had no hesitations since they’ve been doing it for a while, and consumed it in a bite. As Hajime chewed it in his mouth, Shia’s Usamimis were waving as if she was happy, incidentally, her bunny tail was also wiggling.



When such a spectacle was shown, Kaori and Teio couldn’t afford to stay put either. Both of them panicked and thrusted their forks into their food.



[Ha, Hajime-kun, me too, ah~n!]



[Master. Please eat mistress’s without delay. ah~nja]



[……Just this once]



No matter how many [Ah~n] were done, if the menu was the same then he’d get bored. That’s why, he gave out a warning, the 2 [Ah~n]’ed as they responded to Hajime. With that he consumed both with a bite each. Kaori and Teio both had soft and warm expressions. *<-it’s described as ???, basically that fulfilling look that anime characters get when they see cute things*



[What’s with this atmosphere…..it’s very uncomfortable…..]



Shizuku’s cheeks cramped up as a pink barrier surrounded Hajime. Kouki and Ryutaro who was next to her and Suzu also felt uncomfortable. Only Aiko had thought for a moment if she should also do it, while she was scolding herself for thinking about it everyone else were already through with it.



The other school girls had an awkward air around them as the sweet air dispersed, as they stared at Hajime and them they began to, K~ya K~ya, and make a ruckus. The eyes which seemed to have looked at Hajime containing slight fears was now converted into a love story almost immediately. Since that day when he fell into hell, who would have thought that “he” would become the owner of this kind of harem……the girl’s eyes shined with curiosity and watched Hajime.



On one side, the boys as had slight fears like the girls but it turned into awe as they paid attention.



However, there were also glares of jealousy and envy which burned brightly that appeared here and there. After all, Hajime was surrounded by beautiful women and it wouldn’t be an exaggeration to call them “peerless” beauties. Many eyes gazed on Shia in particular. As expected, even if they didn’t have a geeky hobby, a girl with Usamimis accurately tickled the heart of a man. Furthermore the present Shia had a lovely smile as she was next to Hajime, occasionally, her Usamimi’s that moved around had extremely destructive powers.



But, no matter how much they were consumed by jealousy and envy, would they get to know the secret to happily get along with beauties in a different world if they asked? but they couldn’t say it. Once before, they called Hajime “incompetent” so they kept to themselves quietly, his overwhelming strength and unique atmosphere he carried now was enough to make them lose their nerves.



Hajime was lightly ignoring his classmate’s stares however for some reason, Kaori who he saw at the edge of his view was blushing while holding a fork…..



Kaori had allowed her eyes to swim around a bit and seems to have come to a conclusion about something, she apologetically used her fork to eat up the rest of her dish. And she blushed once again.



Instinctively, is it puberty! Hajime was tempted to tsukkomi but, before he could, Yue’s severe tsukkomi came out. At the same time that Kaori who noticed that Yue was quietly watching her and aligned their eyes, those words came out.



[……Hentai] *<-Pervert*



[! Tha, that’s wrong! What are you saying! I, I’m only eating as usual!]



[……Is what you say, but you’re thoroughly enjoying Hajime’s taste]



[A, am not! Be, besides, if you’re saying such things then, Teio is the real hentai right! Look, she’s magnificently licking the fork!]



[Rerorerorero, nmu?] *<-Rero = Licking noises*



Kaori refuted Yue with a bright red face, ~Bishi~! and pointed an Teio. Up ahead of that was Teio who was licking and savoring a normal fork with a blank look.



That’s right, are there any problems? is what her expression was like, Teio was holding the fork in her mouth like nothing was wrong. She was clearly enjoying something else. She was through with some other kind of content. She was a huge M hentai, but it appears that she somehow evolved into a anything goes hentai somewhere along the line.



[Teio, stop that immediately. Or I’ll send you flying]



Hajime warned Teio while his temple was twitching.



[Mu~u, I guess there’s no other way. …..Master still hasn’t kissed mistress yet. If I don’t satisfy myself at times like these, I’ll become frustrated]



Hajime’s temple twitched more because for some odd reason he was criticized back. Then, at that time, Teio suddenly recalled something and her eyes started shining.



[That’s right! Master! I haven’t received my reward yet! Mistress desires the promised reward!]



[Ah? “Reward”?]



Towards Teio’s words, for a moment Hajime was thinking, [What are you talking about?], as he frowned, then he immediately recalled and clicked his tongue ~Chi~. The people who didn’t know what they were talking about tilted their heads, as the representative, Shia asked.



[What do you guys mean……by reward?]



[Umu, at the head temple where Sensei-dono was entrusted to me, I was promised that I would be rewarded if I kept her safe until the end. Nufufufu…..master. You’re not thinking about going back on your promise right?]



Shia and Kaori both, [That’s sly!], and made a ruckus, Teio urged that the promise be kept while laughing heartily. Somehow or another, everyone’s attention were gathering, Hajime had an unpleased look as he turned towards Teio.



[And? What’s your wish? Though I’ll say it first, I’ll only do what’s “within my range” alright?]



Implying that just like the time with Shia’s reward, requests like *sex*“Hold me” won’t be allowed? Teio also seems to have guessed his intentions and she nodded exaggeratedly that she understood it. And while blushing and fidgeting, she said her demand.



[Be relieved, I won’t be asking anything unreasonable. It’s~, just like when we first met…..I want you to tease mistress’s ass]



With both hands on her cheeks, [K~ya! I said it!], Teio seemed to be implying as she ~Iyan Iyan~’ed. Because it’s already been done once, it wouldn’t be unreasonable? And completely disregarded the abnormality of the contents as she asked for an unreasonable demand. As expected of a Hentai.



Sure enough, all humans other than Yue and them were intensely shocked by those remarks.



Their eyes turned towards Hajime, it was the same eyes as if looking at a criminal.



[Rejected, this worthless dragon. Don’t go saying remarks that remarkably invite misunderstandings!]



Towards Hajime who plainly rejected the demand, Teio made an expression as if she was shocked and intensely protested.



[Wh, why! It shouldn’t have been an unreasonable demand! Just like at that time, I just want you to thrust your thick and hard, black rod into mistress’s ass! Just like that time when you were always grinding up and quickly pulling it out while ignoring mistress’s pleas! I want you to relentlessly torment mistress’s ass!]



[I’ve already said it! Quit saying remarks that invite misunderstandings!]



The gazes being directed at Hajime turned into eyes as if looking at a devil.



[……But, It’s not a complete misunderstanding right?]



Yue and them, [Ah]’ed, Aiko who seemed to have been slightly displeased expression called out to Hajime with thorns attached.



[……Certainly, you didn’t say any lies]



[Actually, it was stuck…..]



[Un, Nagumo-kun was completely merciless]



The classmates’ doubts changed into conviction after hearing Aiko and the Ai-chan bodyguards such as Sonobe and the others voiced their thoughts.



[……Hajime-san, as expected calling it a misunderstanding is a little……]



[……Hajime. Hajime was the cause of Teio’s Hentai transformation. It can’t be helped]



Unexpectedly Shia and Yue had betrayed him.



[Na, Nagumo-kun…..people like you……what have you done to Teio-san…..]



[Hajime-kun……how envio-……I mean, you have to take responsibility]



The gazes directed at Hajime were like eyes that were looking at a demon lord.



Hajime slowly stood up without a word and stretched out his right hand upwards. In front of everyone who was wondering what he was going to do, Hajime pulled out the black stake for Pile-bunker out of the “Treasure Warehouse”. For some reason, the stake was already giving out red sparks as he pulled it out.



Cold sweat ran down Teio’s cheek.



[OK, Teio. Lets give you your reward. Eh? You want it rammed up your ass right? Rejoyce, its much thicker and harder than before, it’s an excellent piece which I can boast about. You won’t even have time to pant, you’ll die in an instant]



Teio had realised, [This is bad, I got too full of myself].



Pile-bunker being used on Teio was the results of a fight, while being viewed with eyes as if looking at a pervert, Hajime simply went berserk. By the way, if you looked objectively, it certainly wasn’t a misunderstanding when pointed out.



[W, wait a bit, master. What I said a while ago was only an example, I didn’t say that you had to use it again? As expected, if something like that is used I’ll end up dying! I’ll apologise so, quickly, put that away!]



[Don’t hold back Teio. You want this right? What, did you want to waste precious time to go to a room. I’ll pierce you here]



[Hi~n, master’s eyes are serious~! Yue, Shia, Kaori~, stop master already! Help me~!]



As Hajime approached while gushing out sparks and crackles, Teio became teary eyed and asked for Yue and them for help. As expected, she didn’t want the punishment of dying in a single blow. But, her cheeks were slightly blushed and her breathing was rough, it seems that her performance ran deep.



Hajime looked at Teio who was clinging onto Kaori and hiding behind her, and with his upset feelings washed away he, ~Fu~n~, snuffled with his nose, the stake was returned into the “Treasure Warehouse” and he returned to his seat. However, the classmates didn’t lose their evaluations of him being a demon lord. Later, two kinds of names spread throughout the Kingdom about the “White haired eyepatch wearing demon king” but……if Hajime had known that he would have gone insane.



[Ha~a, and? The reward itself doesn’t really matter but, don’t you have a more decent demand?]



Hajime let out a sigh as he got back to his seat, it was a sigh of relief in various meanings. The scene where the ass of a beautiful young woman that was about to happen in front of their eyes was well over the capacity for the high school students.



[U, umu. Then, let’s see, the rights of laying on the bed with you? See, it’s always Yue and Shia who gets to be next to master right? Mistress has never slept next to master before. That’s why, tonight, I want to sleep next to master, how about it?]



[Something of that degree is cheap. …..Or rather just say that from the start]



[Mistress’s passion surged out, it’s not something I can control so easily. Accept it]



Teio who was ashamed was wiggling with a surprised expression, when she looked at Shia who was next to her, Shia said, [There’s no helping it then huh~] and shrugged her shoulders. It appears that, tonight, he’ll be sleeping between Yue and Teio. But, while in bed, Hajime would be sandwiched by something else…..



The school girls were making a ruckus again as they went, K~ya K~ya, and the male students were beginning to utter out some kind of curse.



Additionally, Aiko, sleeping with multiple females is immoral! began to give out a teacher-like (Actually, she probably held a lot of personal resentment) preach, on the other hand, with Shia and Yue’s relation exposed she was objecting against it now, Yue leaned on Hajime and stuck out her tongue and released her bewitching atmosphere after finishing her meal, because of that the classmates were further heated up, and some boys were unable to stand up straight anymore…..and, the dining room’s atmosphere was filled with chaos.



While ignoring the noisy girls uproars, Hajime decided to recall what happened today.



They free falled from [Kamiyama] and appeared with Kaori whose body was replaced, they went to the adventurers guild and created a “Gold” ranked man-woman, played a grand game of tag with the craftsmen of the Kingdom which caused great confusion, allowed the royal family to gain control of the situation, beated up the to-be king and he also lost his first crush.



In order to kill time, by chance, he met up with Aiko and she revealed her heavy worries, and while having dinner expecting to relax it turned into a disturbance. These were the events which happened to Hajime in a day at the Kingdom. It may be Hajime’s fate to be a maelstrom of confusion and disturbances.



Tomorrow, Hajime and them will be taking Ririana and them and leaving the Kingdom. Hajime and them have no intentions of entering the Empire’s capital at all……Surely, “without a doubt” probably isn’t possible.



As expected, what really lies on the grounds towards the east…..Hajime had a premonition of the new disturbances to come, while feeling the softness and warmth of Yue who was hugging his arm, ma~a, whatever it is, he shrugged his shoulder.





Chapter 111




The thick clouds underneath them were quickly passing by. The grass plains and trees were overlapping with the clouds, occasionally a small village could be seen, but as expected it would be quickly left behind in no time at all. It was supposed to going at a considerable amount of speed but, some kind of barrier was placed which made the breeze comfortable.



Someone’s ponytail trademark was drifting in the comfortable breeze, It was Shizuku who was watching the scenery before her eyes, and she changed her glance over towards the sun which shone brightly overhead.



The blessing of lights seen from clouds, if we reached out would we be able to grasp it? it was so close that it could be mistaken as so. Shizuku was leaning her back on the handrail while blocking the sunlight with her hand, as if looking far into the distance, she suddenly muttered something as if she was tired from just thinking about it.



[…..Who would have expected that he built an airship. …..He can already do everything huh]



Right, the place where Shizuku was currently at was the rear deck of the airship “Feruniru” that Hajime created.



This Feruniru was mainly made out of gravity stones and induction stones, along with other various functions built in, it was their new way of transportation. The reason why they’ve never used it up until now was solely because Hajime had thought that it was too early.



Though it wasn’t difficult to move something through gravity stones, the bigger the mass became the more you needed to be experienced in Creation magic. As far as the Cross bitts go, they had a limit of being able to only lift up 1 person.



However, through the results of pilling on training between several intervals of time, he finally became skilled enough to freely operate a large floating mass, the compiled data was then used to create the airship, “Fenuniru”. Since they’ve left the Kingdom, everyone was doubting Hajime as they gathered at the grass plains on the outskirts of the Kingdom without a wagon nor a car which ran on magic, when Hajime showed Fenuniru he had a triumphant look on his face.



[It’s commonsense that flight transportation devices are obtained near the end of a journey]



Is what he said while full of confidence.



This Feruniru was 120 meters in length and in the shape of a devil fish, inside of it contained halls that led to the bridge towards the front and living quarters at the center, furthermore there was also a kitchen and room to take baths. Though I say that, because they’re able to travel to the Empire which usually takes 2 months by carriage in only 1 and a half days, how much the utilities are going to be used is unknown. Even just floating in the sky consumes quite a bit of magical power. If it wasn’t Hajime, then using it for long times would be impossible.



[So this was where you were……Shizuku]



[Kouki…..]



As Shizuku was recalling Hajime’s words and tsukkomied in her mind, just what about this is commonsense?, she was called out to.



When Shizuku looked towards the voice, Kouki’s face appeared from the hatch that just opened up. Kouki came straight up besides Shizuku and with both arms on the handrail, he began to look towards the clouds that were in the distance.



And he started to mutter something.



[This is…..incredible]



[That’s right. ……I’m already tired of being surprised at every little thing]



Naturally, what Kouki was talking about was the airship Feruniru. However, his expression showed no colors of admiration, it was somewhat discouraged and at the same time, mortifying.



[Hows everyone else?]



[Ryutaro and the imperial guards are eating what Shia-san cooked for them. Suzu is chatting with Riri. …..Nagumo is…..flirting around. At the bridge laying down and relaxing…..]



The reason they accompanied Hajime was to keep their promise of protecting and sending off princess Ririana and her imperial guards to the Empire, and it was only Kouki’s Hero party. The remaining students who couldn’t fight were left with Aiko, the Nagayama front-forces as well, they decided to protect the Kingdom while Kouki and them weren’t there.



To begin with, the long-distance transfer that Freed left behind at the Kingdom gave them a hint, there was an artifact that allowed them to return at anytime, if Kouki and them asked Hajime they’d be able to return immediately.



Shizuku glanced towards Kouki who was a biting his words. Shizuku could somehow sympathized with his behavior, she scratched her cheek and showed a wry smile as if asking, what’s up, and talked.



[What is it, you seem pretty dissatisfied? Does it not sit well with you that Nagumo-kun is popular?]



[……It’s not like that]



Shizuku called out while poking fun at him, Kouki’s expression seemed to have been ill-humored and replied bluntly.



[……Being able to create something this amazing…..and being insanely strong…..why is it that he’s able to act so nonchalantly like that. …..Why was he so easily able to abandon them….]



[……..]



It appears that Kouki is still not comfortable with Hajime’s judgement to not fight god and abandon this world. If he himself had that much power then he’d go off and save the world from god himself……while he was thinking about that, Shizuku completely understood what he meant.



[……He’s probably already chosen]



[chosen?]



Shizuku’s reply which she muttered made Kouki turn his glance at her again. While Shizuku was looking far into the distance, she took her time to choose her words.



[He is…..probably not as free as he appears? Perhaps, even though he looks calm, I think he’s probably always “frantic”. He’s always “frantically” trying to survive with his important people]



[…….]



[He’s already said it too right? You don’t do something because you’ve gained power, because you want to do something you use power. Right now what you’re feeling is the “difference”, it wasn’t something that he had from the beginning. “Incompetent”, “Good-for-nothing”, while being told such things, he crawled up from the bottom and obtained it. …..Literally, what he obtained at the end was determination and resolution. Not In order to defeat god, nor save the world. It’s much simpler, it’s for those who are close to him…..it’s completely different from us who “because we can, we will”. That’s why, even if hes being told “because you can, then do it”, he won’t easily nod and agree with it. Because, he didn’t obtain power for that purpose, if he looks the other way and loses his most important things then he’d obtain nothing out of it….]



[…..I don’t really understand]



[U~n. Though it may be a bit different, look, in order to become the boxing world champion I worked hard, since you’re strong, wipe out all the evil in the town! saying something like that just doesn’t work out?]



[Mu….when you say it like that…..but, what’s on the line are the lives of the people of this world]



Midway in, Kouki stubbornly refuted Shizuku while his eyebrows were in a ? shape.



[Ma~a, not being able to leave behind people in need is one of your good traits but…..that’s only Kouki’s senses of value so you shouldn’t force them onto Nagumo-kun]



[…..What’s with that, do you have his back on this?]



[What childish things are you saying. I’m simply talking about people in general? Besides, I’m sure you haven’t forgotten it, somehow or another Nagumo-kun has saved numerous people including us. It was the same for the town of Ulu as well, Kaori also said that he saved the Ankaji dukedom too. It seems he also wiped out the hidden organization that took part in human trafficking at Fuyuren and he also rescued Myu who was a Umininzoku child and returned her to her mother too. ……As for us, I don’t think we’ve done much to save the people from this world?]



[That’s……]



[Surely for himself…..he’d only act for those who are important to him such as Yue and them…….fufu, thinking about that, eventually he might “Take the opportunity” to send god flying away?]



[What’s with that, that pitiful god….]



While thinking of such silly things, Shizuku laughed as she thought that it was possible in the future if it was Hajime. Kouki had a complicated expression but, he didn’t have the strength to deny Shizuku’s words so he tsukkomied and stopped at that. For a while, a time of silence passed by. Shizuku guessed that Kouki was thinking while carrying conflicted feelings within himself again and decided to not say anything.



Then, at that time, Feruniru which had flown in a straight course and fixed speed suddenly went off course. Kouki and Shizuku were wondering what happened since if they just flew straight they’d reach the Empire.



[…..Did something happen?]



[For the time being, shall we go back inside]



The two nodded in consent and quickly returned into the ship.



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



When Shizuku and Kouki entered the bridge, everyone had already gathered around the crystal like object at the center.



[What happened?]



[Ah, Shizuku-chan. Un, for some reason people are being chased by the Empire’s soldiers]



Kaori answered Shizuku who asked. What Kaori pointed towards in cubic crystal was, several Usagininzoku’s running through a valley, behind them were approaching empire soldiers who were playing a real game of tag with them.



This crystal was created with the “Distant Viewing Stone” and “Distance Transmitting Stone” through Creation magic, it was possible to project the image of the distant surroundings with the crystal installed in the bridge, in simple terms, it was a telescope which was capable of projecting an image.



When Shizuku looked at the crystal display, certainly, there were 2 Usagininzoku women between a narrow valley without any flowing water, they seemed to be worrying as they ran away from the Empire soldiers who were approaching behind them. Behind the approaching Empire soldiers were several large transportation carriages, rather than chasing them from the beginning, did they escape instead? Or were they trying to catch the Usagininzoku’s that they found by chance?



It appears that Hajime and them saw the situation and slowed down Feruniru. Normally he’d just ignore it but, because it was Shia’s race he decided to be concerned about it.



[Isn’t this bad! If we don’t immediately help them!]



Kouki shouted out as expected. It seemed like he’d jump out at any moment even though they were in the sky.



However, Hajime didn’t answer the rushing Kouki, he drew his eyebrows closer to the crystal display and looked at it suspiciously.



[Oi, Nagumo! Surely you’re not intending to abandon those girls are you!? If you won’t be helping then I’ll go! Hurry and let me down!]



[Shia, these guys are…..]



[Eh? ……Ar~e? These 2 are…..]



Hajime ignored the raging Kouki and called out to Shia. Shia also seems to have noticed now that they zoomed in on the image.



[Why are you two so laid back! Their the same race as Shia-san right! Do you think nothing of it!]



[I’m sorry, you’re a bit noisy so could you quiet down for a bit? …..Hajime-san, there’s no doubt about it. It’s Rana-san and Mina-san]



[As expected huh. ……Because of their sudden change in condition I had a hard time remembering. ……These guys movements and expressions…..fumu]



Kouki’s opinion was completely cut off by Shia and he instinctively became quiet. By the way, the reason why Kouki was addressing Shia with “San” was due to the results of her introducing herself by her first name with a refreshing smile, but Shia had said to just call her by her first name without adding honorifics with a smile.



In the meantime, the two Usagininzoku women stopped moving their legs as they fell onto the ground. Their current position was at a slightly more open valley.



When he saw that, Kouki regained his senses and decided that he’d leave the bridge and go to the front deck. Though there’s still quite some distance between them, for the time being he was intending to shoot magic to attract the Empire soldiers attention.



[Ma~a, wait. Amanogawa. It’s fine]



[Wha, what are you saying! Those feeble women seem like they’d be attacked at any moment!]



~Ki~ Kouki glared at Hajime in frustration, However, Hajime was smiling from ear to ear and muttered like something was interesting as he looked at the crystal display.



[Feeble? No way. Those guys are…..the “Hauria” you know?]



What are you saying? immediately after Kouki’s doubtful expression, [Ah!], someone’s astonished voice sounded out. When Kouki looked towards the crystal display to see what happened, what was there was……a mountain of corpses consisting of Empire soldiers who were beheaded or pierced accurately through the head by an arrow.



[…….Eh?]



Not just Kouki but everyone who didn’t know of the Hauria tribe became dot eyed. In the meantime, feeling suspicious that the forces which left the transportation wagons weren’t returning after they went to chase the Usagininzoku, they decided to send out several scouts.



And, when those scouts found the mountain of their comrades corpses, they called out to the two Usagininzoku women who were at the center leaning on one another and shaking as they approached in a threatening voice.



They may have usually been much more careful of their actions after suddenly finding a mountain of their comrades corpses but, before them were the pet slaves who had absolutely no fighting power. They approached while upset but had no caution. They got closer.



The moment when one of the scouts was about to grab one of the Usagininzoku woman by her Usamimis, an arrow shot out from somewhere and pierced through the scout behind him in the head. When the scout noticed the sound of the man collapsing on the the ground and convulsing, he looked back.



In front of him, the Usagininzoku woman who should have been trembling in fear got up without a sound, at some point she was already wielding a short sword in her hand and the scout in front of her was easily beheaded.



And the other Usagininzoku woman also immediately kept a low posture as she crawled on the ground towards the beheaded man who was falling sideways and easily reaped the head of the last scout who was stunned towards the sudden situation.



The head popped off as if it was a toy, Kouki and them, [U~], became pale faced and held their mouths. Princess Ririana and her imperial guards instinctively stared at Shia when the impossible scene of the Usagininzoku killing the Empire soldiers were shown. The special one wasn’t only you!? with their eyes opened wide in surprise.



[No, without a doubt I’m the only special one? There’s no way that there would be so many just like me. That was the results of training for them. …..Hajime-san placed them into a hell which couldn’t be lukewarm, it was training which could be called devil remodeling, that kind of feeling]



[ [ [ [ [……] ] ] ] ]



Everyones line of sight turned towards Hajime. Their eyes all clearly expressed the same things. In other words, [It was you again!?]. Hajime abruptly averted his eyes.



In the meantime, the situation was coming to its final stages. The remaining empire soldiers and the transport wagon finally reached the slaughter site. The Empire soldiers foot completely came to a stop when they noticed the appearance of their comrades that were scattered on the road to block them.



They couldn’t just advance on ahead by trampling on the corpses as if nothing happened, above all they became intensely agitated as they made a ruckus.



And the Hauria tribe didn’t let that chance go by. No, everything may have been done for the sake of that chance to appear. The remaining Empire soldiers numbered 12. The Hauria tribesmen jumped out from both sides of the cliff, suddenly they appeared but even with the 2 women from before their numbers was only 5 people. However the Hauria tribesmen who jumped at them were better prepared to fight against the Empire soldiers, 3 heads were sent flying, and 1 person was shot right through the middle of their forehead by an arrow.



The Hauria didn’t let up their fierce attacks. Just like the flowing water, they attacked the Empire soldiers as a group.



The moment that one of the Empire soldiers managed to grab their sword, a Hauria would jump from the side and immediately cut their head off.



Arrows came flying towards the Empire soldiers from the front. It’s speed was unlike those before it, they were transparent and the instant they tried to clear away as the Empire soldiers read where the arrow was going, a different Usagininzoku would come in from their blind spot and cut off their head.



While the Empire soldiers gave out a courageous roar as they approached and kicked the heads of the beheaded soldiers. The moment that their eyes were fixed onto the Haruia who were unforgivable due to their angered hearts, a different Hauria suddenly appeared behind their backs and beheaded them.



When you thought it was the right, they came from the left, when you thought they were in front, they came from the back, there were no restrictions, the Empire soldiers were at the mercy of the ever changing attacks. It didn’t take much time……until their heads flew through the air.



[Is, is this supposed to be the Usagininzoku…….]



[Seriously……]



[Rabbit’s are scary….]



Mutters filled with horror were heard on the bridge of Feruniru.



[Fu~n, their proficiency hasn’t dropped at all. It doesn’t seem like they skipped out on training. ……But, their ending was a bit weak]



As Kouki and them were still stunned with open mouths, Hajime pulled out Schlagen and opened up a part of the windshield and pushed the muzzle outside with a standing shooting posture. There was still around 5 kilometers before the site. Everyone besides Yue and them were popeyed, Hajime was smiling and looking straight ahead without moving. Then he gently pulled the trigger.



Doba~an!!



The sound of an explosion was heard and a line flashed through the sky from Schlagen which gave off bright red sparks.



It blew up the head of the Empire soldier who jumped out of the carriage and was about to cast magic on the Hauria. There were also Empire soldiers in the carriage. With “Distant View” in Hajime’s magic eye, he was able to detect the surge of magic building up, he had noticed that the soldier was planning an ambush attack so he sniped him from Feruniru.



On the crystal display, it showed the Hauria tribesman’s surprised expressions when the ambushers head was completely blown off. They immediately traced the line of trajectory and noticed Feruniru that was flying in the sky.



Normally they’d become cautious with the attack that came from a mysterious flying object but…..In the next instant their expressions became joyful.



A boy with a crossbow on his shoulder jumped out from the shadows of the rocks and smiled fearlessly! and decided to wildly salute. They seemed to have noticed who the person who shot out that flash was. It was to be expected of them. A bright red flash was a classic symbol of their boss who they loved and respected…..



The Hauria tribesmen saluted the boy whom they followed gladly. There appearances were seen reflected on the crystal display and once again everyones gazes turned towards Hajime. This time their eyes contained a lot of amazement. What kinds of things did he have to do to make the gentle Usaginizokus turn into that, Kouki and the others had eyes that silently questioned that.



[Hajime-san, Hajime-san. Let’s quickly get down. To be doing this kind of thing outside of the Sea of Trees…..maybe they’ve run out of control again…..]



Kouki and them watched as Shia rushed Hajime. From the Hauria tribesman’s strategy, they were clearly aiming for the Empire’s transportation force, it appears that, they took a trip outside of the Sea of Trees in order to kill Empire soldiers which caused Shia to became worried if they were intoxicated by battle again and ran out of control.



Hajime had thought from their appearances that there was no way of that happening but, because Shia had an anxious face, Hajime himself became slightly interested and decided to land Feruniru in the valley.



When Hajime and them got off at the valley, there were a lot of Demi-humans there besides the Hauria. There seems to have been about 100 people. It appears that that contents of the transportation wagons were Demi-humans. Besides Usagininzokus, there were Kitsuneninzoku*Fox* as well as Inuninzoku’s*Dog* too, Nekoninzoku*Cat*, and many women and children Morininzoku*Forest People/elves*. Everyone looked at Hajime and them with cautious eyes, they weren’t able to hide their surprise at the flying vehicle which they’ve never seen nor heard about before. It certainly was an encounter with the unknown.



And, with 80% of those who were surprised, a boy with a crossbow on his shoulder ran through the other 20% of Demi-humans who were confused and cautious, he immediately appeared before Hajime and performed a splendid salute with his back straightened.



[It’s been a long time, Boss! I’ve been awaiting the day when we meet once again! I’ve never thought that you’d appear again like this, I’m once again impressed! Also for helping us a while ago, I thank you!]



[Yo~o, it’s been a long time. Ma~a, don’t mind what happened earlier. Since it was you guys, you’d likely be able to take on that kind of damage. ….You’ve guys have improved quite a bit]



When Hajime had a smile on his face and said that, 2 women and 3 men with Usamimis had come out from the dumbfounded Demi-humans and saluted just like the boy with Usamimis, their eyes were beginning to water up because of their overflowing emotions. And, while wonderfully harmonizing their voices and their arranged heels sounding out.



[ [ [ [ [ [We’re grateful, Sir!!] ] ] ] ] ]



The Hauria’s voices trembled and echoed through the valley. They were moved enough to tears, but they didn’t cry as their boss who they hold in high esteem praised them of their growth. Everyone looked up towards the empty sky and seemed to have held back the tears that were about to pour out. It appears that they put in slightly too much effort into holding the tears back as their eyes became bloodshot and scary. Hajime, Yue, and Shia were calm but, Teio and Kaori in the back, Kouki and them and Ririana and them were completely taken aback.



[Ehtto, It’s been a long time everyone! It’s great that you’re energetic above all else. By the way, where are father and them? Is it just you guys Pal-kun? Also, why are you guys in such a place, going against the Empire soldiers…..]



[Please calm down, Shia-anego*older sister, extremely humble way*. If you don’t ask one at a time I won’t be able to answer? For the time being, right now there’s only the 6 of us here. There are various circumstances, lets find a calm place where we can talk in detail. ….And also, it’s not Pal-kun, its “Baltoferd of Certain Death”. Please don’t make mistakes?]



[……Eh? Did you tsukkomi me just now? Or rather you’re still taking up that name…..Rana-san and you guys should also be cautious]



Pal was the same as always and Shia massaged her temple as she endures her headache. However, the opinion to move to a different place was reasonable, for the time being she’ll not press them any further, Shia gave out a warning to the woman Rana as well as the other members to not follow Pal’s lead and change their names.



But, the reality was already something that went above expectations.



[……Shia. It’s not Rana…….its “Rana Inferna of Swift Shadows”]*I think, ???????????*



[!? Rana-san!? What are you saying……]



Out of the Hauria’s, Rana had a firm older sister feeling, Shia’s cheeks start cramping up as she never thought this would happen. However the Hauria’s furious attacks didn’t stop. Attacking through waves of cooperation was their strengths.



[I’m, “Minasteria the Sky Render”!]*?????????*



[ !? ]



[I’m, “Yaozerias of Mighty Illusions”!]*?????????*



[ !? ]



[I’m, “Yorugandal of Crawling Decapitation”!]*?????????*



[ !? ]



[Fu~, I’m “Liquid Break of Light Rain”]*???????????*



[ !? ]



Everyone had extremely triumphant looks as they took on poses like joO*<-reference which im sure i balls’ed up big time, ?????????????????????????????????* as they introduced their second name. Shia’s expression was dyed in despair. It appears that, the boom of Hauria having 2 names (Chunii) was here. At this rate, the possibility of everyone in the whole clan having them is high. By the way, their official names were only two characters in their heads.*<-not sure what this line was for, i may have screwed up*



The family which she’s reunited with after a long time turned into a situation where they took on poses with triumphant looks while declaring their second name, Shia’s appearance was quite pitiful as she spat out ectoplasm from her mouth. That’s why, Hajime was going to warn them that after several years they’d writhe around on the ground due to the embarrassment whenever they recalled their expressions.



However before he could, a stray bullet shot out from Pal.



[By the way, Which is better boss, “Crimson Flash of Rondo” or “White Claws and Fangs of Gale”?]*Probably wrong ????????(???) and ???????(??????)*



[…..What?]



[Boss’s second name. It was a heated discussion at the clan meeting for 10 days, somehow we’ve managed to narrow it down to these 2. However, we need to find out which is the best in the end, it was settled as a tie after fighting among the clan…..since its come to this, we were to entrust it to boss’s judgement after reuniting. By the way, I’m on the “Crimson Flash of Rondo” side]



[Wait, since when was it required to have 2 names?]



[Boss, I’m firmly on the “White Claws and Fangs of Gale” side]



[No, listen to what I’m saying. I….]



[What are you saying Rana Inferna of Swift Shadows. No matter how you think about it, Boss perfectly fits “Crimson Flash of Rondo”!]



[No, kora, enough of this…..]



[That’s right! He releases sparks of red magical power, master of various weapons and able to freely run around the skies, it’s exactly “Crimson Flash of Rondo”! This is the best JK]*<- unable to actually understand what this meant, ??????JK*



[Stop it, anymore of that shameful commentary is—-]



[Oioi, Yorugandal of Crawling Decapitation. If you say that then, that trademark white hair that waves around as he carries his powerful weapons in both hands called his claws and fangs and attack in waves like a storm, there’s no other way of expressing it than “White Claws and Fangs of Gale”, why can’t you understand? Since when have you become so senile?]



[…….]



Ectoplasm began to flow from Hajime’s mouth. It appears that the surprise present of their embarrassing commentary was making his mind reach it’s limit. As they were getting along well with each other, unknown energy were flowing in the back of Hajime and Shia’s mouths, ~Bufu~! the sound of it spouting resounded.



[Shi, Shizu Shizu, it’s not nice to laugh, Bufu~!]



[Su, Suzu’s laughing as well….Kufu….I wonder….have they been infected with chunii, fu, fufu~]



When Hajime regained his senses and looked behind him, Shizuku and Suzu’s shoulders were shaking as were desperately trying to keep in their laughter. Although they were unable to keep it in at all.



For the time being, Hajime decided to shoot Pal and them who were having their heated discussion with rubber bullets and then turned towards Shizuku and Suzu with a reproachful look as they gradually shook.



[Yaegashi, for the cool you, I’ll forcefully give you a twintail ribbon as a present later. Of course I’ll also keep image recordings of it]



[ ! ]



[Taniguchi, I’ll shorten your height by another 5 centimeters]



[ ! ]



Shizuku and Suzu’s laughing immediately stopped and they trembled in fear. Even if it was unreasonably misplaced anger, if Hajime became serious then the 2 wouldn’t be able to oppose him. And Hajime’s eyes were completely serious.



[Ano……is this a good time?]



While avoiding the Hauria that were floundering on the ground, Shizuku and them were protesting Hajime’s unreasonableness, the voice which called out was a beautiful girl from the feet up, she was a slender beauty who had long blond hair and blue eyes. From her sharp pointy ears they could tell that she was a Morininzoku. Hajime had felt that she kinda looked like one of Fair Bergen’s elders, Alfrerick.



[Are you without a doubt Nagumo Hajime-dono?]



[N? That’s certainly right but…..]



When Hajime nodded, the beautiful blond haired blue eye Morininzoku gave out a relieved sigh as she patted her chest. To begin with, both of her thin hands were bound by metal handcuffs, it seems to have been quite a pitiful state. Her ankles also had shackles with chains fixed on it, every time she walked her white skin turned red as it rubbed her skin.



[Then, is it fine to believe that you won’t capture us and enslave us? I’ve heard from my grandfather that your senses of value for your own race is for better or worst, equal for everything. You would not toy with us Demi-humans…..]



[Grandfather? Is it possibly Alfrerick?]



[That is correct. I’m sorry for the delay but, I am, the only granddaughter of Alfrerick an elder of Fair Bergen, Arutena Haipisuto]



[An elder’s granddaughter was captured……it appears that there really were various circumstances]



Speaking of being the granddaughter of an elder, she’s practically the princess of the Morininzoku, naturally, they should have also had firm escape methods and guards in case of emergencies. Without being able to use them, or it could be said that even if they used them they’d still get caught, that just shows how tight the situation was. As expected, something happened at the large tree? Hajime frowned as it was becoming increasingly necessary to hear Pal and their stories as he sharpened his glance.



In this situation, Hajime called out to Pal and them while ignoring Arutena’s odd continuous stare.



[Oi, you guys. Bring over all the Demi-humans. Incidentally. I’ll send you guys to the Sea of Trees]



[Yes, Sir! Ah, I’m sorry about this but, boss. I want to contact a comrade who’s lurking on the Empire’s outskirts, may I leave midway in?]



[Ahh, that works out just fine, we have a few guys here that we’ll be sending to the Empire, I’ll unload you guys a bit away from the Empire together]



[Thank you very much!]



Currently, Hajime and them were currently not to far away from the Empire. The fact that the Demi-humans were being transported through carriage here would mean that, it wasn’t going from the Sea of Trees to Empire, but rather it came from the Empire and was heading for another place. In other words, Pal and them went to the Empire to gather some kind of information, hearing the story of the transportation, they came chasing after it.



The Demi-humans began walking timidly and uneasily as they were told to by Pal and them. When he saw that, Hajime and them also returned to Feruniru. Then, at that time, nearby Hajime, [K~ya!], a cute scream resounded. Arutena appears to have tripped because of the fetters*chains*. While panicking with both hands in the air, immediately, since she was close—–she ended up clinging onto Hajime’s back.



In an instant, the Demi-humans turned blue and stiffened up. If the other party were Empire soldiers then, the moment they were used as support, an open palm would come flying. While shouting [Why are you touching me without permission, you dirty beasts!]. That’s why, Arutena also thought it would happen? she probably had an illusion that she was going to be hit.



However, Hajime isn’t able to do such vulgar things.



[Ahh? ….Jeez]



As Hajime glanced behind his shoulder, he looked at Arutena’s hands and feet as she cowered back after their glances aligned, [Well, yeah it would be hard to walk in those], while he convinced himself of that, he scratched his head like it was troublesome and kneeled down before Arutena who was standing. Towards that, the Demi-humans began to make a ruckus as if they were upset.



[Ah, ano….]



[It’s fine so just stay still]



Similarly, Arutena was shaken when he suddenly decided to kneel down, right afterwards, Hajime’s actions caused her to become even more uneasy. That was because Hajime was touching Arutena’s foot. To be accurate, he was touching the fetters, Arutena was shocked and trembling. Never before has a man knelt down and touched her feet before, she became stiff and uneasy as her eyes swam around. Then, in the next instant, her eyes rounded up in surprise. Once she noticed that red magical power was gushing out, without a sound the fetters came off.



When Hajime stood back up, this time he held onto both of Arutena’s hands. At that point, Arutena had understood what Hajime was going to do and managed to regain some composure. And once again the fascinating red radiance gushed out again. A small voice that may or may not have resounded, [How beautiful……], was muttered. Recently, has Hajime’s magical powers been sharpened? It seems to have been much brighter than before.



After removing the handcuffs he immediately threw them away and he finally touched Arutena’s neck. It was because a slave’s collar was attached there. With a serious look and having her neck felt by Hajime, Arutena’s cheeks were heating up for some reason. After Hajime easily removed the collar, [This should be alright now], he convinced himself, and as if nothing happened he turned around.



And, Hajime noticed that strangely he had become the center of attention. The Demi-humans were looking at him as if looking at a mysterious person, Pal and the other Hauria seemed to be proud, Kouki and them seemed to be slightly complex, and Yue and the females had eyes filled with both amazement and sharpness. While flinching a bit Hajime questioned, [What is it?].



However, against that, the females who noticed Arutena’s slightly blushed cheeks reacted.



[ [ [ [ [……Nothing (ja*Teio*) (desu*Shia*)] ] ] ] ]



It was incredibly cold.





Chapter 112




After Hajime had unshackled all the demi-humans, they began to explore the airship to satisfy their curiosity, back in the bridge Hajime was listening to Pal and his group’s story.



[I see…. the Majinzoku attacked both the Empire and Sea of Trees]



[Affirmative. Though I don’t know of the details of the Empire, the Sea of Trees was invaded by a large group of strong demons. It would have been dangerous if not for our previously laid traps]



According to Pal, the Majinzoku also took along an army of demons to the Sea of Trees. [Harutsuina Sea of Trees] its natural since Freed’s groups goal is to obtain more Age of Gods magic they would would aim for it, after all it’s well known as one of the great labyrinths.



Naturally the soldiers of Fair Bergen*Faea Belgaen in Endo’s translation, that’s probably the proper way but for my convenience i wont change it* couldn’t permit the Majinzoku to just waltz right in, so they gathered the biggest forces they could muster up in order to confront them. They believed that they had the advantage due to the naturally dense fog, but their expectations were easily betrayed and they soon fell into confusion. Apart from the Majinzoku, the demons that they brought along showed their powers to the fullest extent in the Sea of Trees. Even though the demons were not of the insect type, they paved their way through, defeated and took the lives of many soldiers of Fair Bergen one after another through their odd magic.



The Majinzoku turned around and asked the defeated Demi-humans, similarly to Hajime, [Where is the entrance to the large labyrinth?] However they couldn’t just obediently give information to the enemies, they didn’t know when the Majinzoku would start advancing towards Fair Bergen to ask random bypassers, so they quickly sent someone back to the town. The council was quickly gathered and a decision was made, the demons were far too strong to defend against, they decided to give them the information. In order to avoid a disaster like in Hajime’s case. The labyrinth itself will clear away all who aren’t worthy.



However, even though they asked the same question as Hajime, the Majinzoku had a different sense of value for the Demi-humans. No, the Majinzoku didn’t do as Hajime did at all, they carried a huge sense of discrimination and hatred against Demi-humans.



They believed that the world belongs to the Majinzoku, and that these beasts that have been abandoned by god is of the utmost humiliation and are absolutely unbearable. Their expressions were that of mad men with absolute confidence in their own god.



And, the Majinzoku bared their fangs at Fair Bergen. They decided to hunt down the Demihumans before going into the dungeon.



The soldiers of Fair Bergen fought back desperately. However, the army of unknown demons were too strong and had no troubles in the Sea of Trees, their chances of winning was low.



As it stood, they would be defeated sooner or later, a soldier of the Kumaninzoku*Bear people* understood this and looked for a chance to escape from Fair Bergen. His purpose was not to run away. His purpose was to beg for help.



His name is Regin*Jin in Endo’s translations, again for my convenience i’ll keep it like this* Banton. It was the elder which attacked Hajime out of anger and was greatly injured in the process, it was the man that held a deep grudge against the Hauria*Shia’s group* tribe.



Now, Regin, without shame nor reputation, went forth to bow down to the Hauria tribe which was banished from Fair Bergen. He ran desperately through the Sea of Trees, his body was covered in wounds, when he finally reached the new village he prostrated himself on the ground many times. He asked them earnestly.



—I need your help, please lend me your power.



The head of the Hauria tribe, Cam, went out and answered the wish.



The reason is not for Fair Bergen. Of course their own species, the Usagininzoku were still in Fair Bergen, but that wasn’t the reason either, above all, the thing that Cam could not forgive was the fact that the Majinzoku’s purpose was the great labyrinth.



Emergency, if the Majinzoku’s do something wierd to the labyrinth…..



When their boss Hajime returns at a later time. He would not be able to look him in the eye if the Majinzoku did something to it.



As a subordinate of Hajime, it would not do if the bosses wish was obstructed by something, in order to have a happy reunion where we can proudly stick out our chests, otherwise we don’t have the qualifications to call Hajime, boss! he said.



Though Hajime doesn’t really mind such a thing…..it’s the pride of the Hauria.



As a result, the Hauria tribe, rather than answering Regins request, [Who dares put their hands on something that belongs to the boss, ahn!? if they want to fight, shall we give them a fight!?] with that in their minds, they decided to participate.



Regin’s thoughts later.



[The Hauria were really scary at that time. though they weren’t in a frenzy like last time, their lips were waveringly shaking, and splitting abruptly….they were laughing. Uu, it wasn’t possible for me to sleep well from that day on. …..The rabbits lips were recalled in my dreams, my neck….Haa~ Haa~……no more. My anxiety doesn’t stop. ……Where is the medicine…..]



As the Hauria entered the war, they first decided to wiped out all demons outside of Fair Bergen. Their purpose was to build strategies by confirming the demons movements and odd magics. Although the Hauria tribe became strong, it was due to using their racial abilities to the fullest, along with the mentality of not running away from fights, their spec’s didn’t actually increase in any way, shape, or form. Therefore, they didn’t recklessly charge in against a new kind of demon they’ve never fought before.



The other party was a formidable foe, so resolution was needed, preparation of stealth attacks, surprise attacks, lying and deceiving, they did everything to gather information.



And, when the chest board was set up, they all took the offensive at once. Even if the dense fog wasn’t effective, the demons were skillfully being killed by the Usaginizoku’s original techniques.



Sooner or later the Majinzoku finally started to notice that their demons were disappearing, they ordered a quick regroup. The Hauria that couldn’t defeat demons were made to be decoys, Instructions were then given to place traps around their new village.



Then guiding them was simple. anyhow, being baited so easily, the Majinzoku’s blood rained down and heads rolled on the ground. Then they appeared and snorted through their nose….it was enough.



After wiping out the Majinzoku, the Hauria suffered some losses as well.



However, their current situation wasn’t over yet. Though Fair Bergen was saved by the Hauria, the amount of collateral damage was huge. There was no room to guard the Sea of Trees with all the nursing and funerals that were needed.



Then, at that opening, the Empire soldiers invaded the Sea of Trees.



Their purpose was to abduct Demi-humans.



After the battle was over, the Hauria went back to their village and was late to notice, as a result, there was basically no resistance while kidnaping. When Cam noticed the kidnappings, he kidnaped and questioned an empire soldier, apparently the Empire suffered from a demons attack, it was decided that they needed to secure manpower for repairs, in other words, the Demi-humans(………)that appeared to be the reason for invading the Sea of Trees.



Cam quickly rushes to the other Usagininzoku villages, but he was too late, most of the women and children have already been kidnaped. It’s clear that the powerless Usagininzoku’s were not abducted in order to help with the required manpower for the empire. Their purpose was to be used to satisfy their people after receiving an attack.



As expected, the Hauria tribe could not overlook their fellow species, the majority of their forces were left to guard the Sea of Trees, Cam and a small group chased after the Empire soldiers transport wagon that was heading towards the Imperial Capital.



However, communications with Cam was suddenly cut off after they reached the Imperial capital. No one came to the meeting place that was set up ahead of time.



The remaining people at the Sea of Trees became restless and decided to send out scouts towards the empire.



Results, Cam’s group that invaded the Imperial capital never came out.



Afterwards, in order to invade the Imperial capital and find out Cam’s status, Pal’s group was gathering information on the security of the capital when they noticed that there was a transportation wagon with a large amount of Demi-humans leaving for another town, Pal’s group then put information gathering on hold and went to rescue their comrades.



[However boss, by any chance, have other places also been attack by Majinzoku?]



[Ahh, they’re active behind the scenes here and there? well, luckily I was around and they were all defeated]



If you think about it, Hajime could be considered a God of Plague for the Majinzoku. This is because he doesn’t actually hold any hostility towards their race, it just so happens that their timing is bad, so he ends up kicking them out of his way when they obstruct him.



[Well, I have a rough understanding of what’s going on. First of all, you need more information about Cam who’s in the Imperial capital?]



[Affirmative. And, though I’m sorry boss…..]



[I understand. We’ll be passing by anyways. The fellows that got caught, I’ll send them back to the Sea of Trees]



[Thank you!]



Pal and his group all bow at once. Though Shia mumbled a little, nothing was said.



Hajime noticed it and knew what Shia wanted to say, but he waited for her to say it herself, in the end nothing was said.



Finally, Hajime received a message for the leftover forces at the Sea of Trees, then dropped off Riria-na*the Princess* and Pal’s group off a little ways away from the Imperial capital. Then his party set a course at full speed towards [Harutsuina Sea of Trees].



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



Once again Hajime set foot on [Harutsuina Sea of Trees] and welcomed the dense fog which shuts out all light ahead.



Still, if there were no Demi-humans to guide the way, people who were below Hajime’s inhumane level would likely be driven mad. As Hajime led the group, in order to not be separated he placed Demi-humans on the outside to enclose their surroundings.



Strangely Arutena was walking especially close to Hajime, he decided to ignore it and keep advancing. Shia who was walking nearby had an anxious face, suddenly her ears reacted with a ~pico pico~. Shia lifted up her face, then began to stare at what lied ahead.



[Hajime-san, there’s an armed group up ahead]



The surrounding Demi-humans turned a surprised look towards Shia due to her words. Even the kidnapped Usagininzoku in the group were surprised that Shia had managed to perceive something that they couldn’t.



As if confirming Shia’s words, a group of Toramimi*Tiger eared* Demi-humans appeared through the fog with weapons. The armed group had fierce eyes and stared at them, then they sensed that there was a large group of Demi-humans in the group, so they decided to not suddenly attack.



Among them, the eyes of the Toraninzoku*Tiger race* who seemed to be the leader, stopped at Hajime. His eyes were then opened wide in astonishment.



[You, that time…..]



Hajime also recalled the Toraninzoku’s appearance. His name is Ghil*Gil in Endo’s Official translation*, he was the commander of the security force that confronted Hajime the first time he came to the Sea of Trees. Apparently he survived the invasion and is currently patrolling again.



[What on earth do you want this time…..is that, Arutena!? Are you alright!?]



[Ah, Yes. These people and the Hauria tribe helped me]



Ghil tried to ask Hajime’s purpose in a wild voice, and Arutena who was by his side noticed and showed herself. To the words of Arutena, a deep sigh of relief and amazement was heard.



[That’s good. Alfrerick-sama was very sad. quickly, please show him your energetic appearance. …….Boy. You, for what reason did you help us Demi-humans? Though it doesn’t suit you who is arrogant and haughty…..well, you have my thanks]



[There wasn’t a specific reason. it was only a coincidence, a coincidence]



From the atmosphere of meeting an acquaintance, Shizuku’s group had doubtful faces. Shia then explained what had happened quietly, also how she fell in love with Hajime, and their faces showed consent.



[Now then, are any of the Hauria tribe stationed at Fair Bergen? or, a fellow that knows where their current village is located?]



[Mu? If its people from the Hauria tribe, there should be several in Fair Bergen. Though you’ve likely heard, there was an invasion, so many are currently living in Fair Bergen]



[Thats good then. Well, lets quickly head for Fair Bergen]



Hajime says so and urges ahead quickly. With an amazed face again, as usual it seems his attitude hasn’t changed much, Ghil ordered his troops to brace their arms in order to guide them back.



There wasn’t any feeling hostility like the first time anymore, is it because they were saved by the Hauria tribe which Hajime trained, or is it because there’s a great number of people this time…..they were being mature about it and guiding Hajime, though it is convenient that they can get in without any trouble.



At last we’ve reached Fair Bergen, though it has changed greatly. First of all, the huge dignified gate had collapsed, the leftover remains have yet to be cleaned up.



And, the capital of the Sea of Trees which charmed Hajime with its fantastic beauty of nature, was completely destroyed with remains here and there, the air corridors and waterways made of tree trunks were broken down in places.



[This is awful…..]



Someone muttered.



Hajime totally agreed as well. The cold breeze coming from the darkness and Fair Bergen itself contained a gloomy atmosphere.



Then, people who happened to pass by saw Arutena and their expressions stiffens up, it was unbelieveable, afterwards, they exploded into cheers and ran up to them.



They finally notice that there is a party of humans by their side, when they were told of how Arutena was helped by them their expressions were still stiff, but as they embraced one another exposing their joy, their wariness was relinquished. Of the kidnapped people, there were many that ran at full speed towards their house, after first bowing to Hajime.



The circle that encloses Hajime gradually grows, and the surroundings were completely buried by the people of Fair Bergen as they noticed. After a while the crowd begins to open a pathway. On the other side, stood Alfrerick Haipisuto, the most important person of Fair Bergen.



[Grandfather!]



[Oh, Oh, Arutena! Im glad, you were alright…..]



Arutena, ran at full speed while tears overflowing from her eyes, and jumped into her grandfather’s chest. To the reunion of two family members that was thought to never be able to see one another again, many surrounding people were moved to tears.



After embracing one another for a while, Alfrerick later separated from his granddaughter and gently pats her head, then his gaze was turned to Hajime. A wry smile appeared in his expression.



[……Its become a surprising reunion, Hajime Nagumo. Surely, I didn’t think that my granddaughter would be saved. Our previous relationship aside*I improvised here, couldn’t actually understand it though it has something to do with relationships i think*. …….We sincerely express our gratitude, Thank you]



[I only brought them here. If you wish to thank someone then thank the Hauria tribe. I’ve heard that there are people from the Hauria tribe here, let me meet with them…..]



[Yes, but it’s you who changed the Hauria tribe. What goes around, comes around, you’ve not only saved my granddaughter, but also, us all. That is the fact. Your kindness is far more than we deserve and we would never be able to repay it all, but, at least accept our gratitude.]



Hajime, from Alfrerick’s words, just shrugs his shoulders reluctantly and was scratching his cheek from having been slightly embarrassed.



Yue, Shia, Teio, and Kaori are happy from watching the heartwarming scene. And, the man who dove into the dungeon in order to train and save the human race, to the fact that Hajime has been saving people all around the world, a complex expression was shown on Kouki’s face.



Afterwards, Hajime, the Hauria tribe heard of their arrival and are quickly returning to Fair Bergen, we were given permission to wait in Alferick’s house.



As to Alferick’s order, they were treated to tea(Arutena blushed a great deal when our hands touched while she handed me tea*Improvised a little here but, it should be alright. There was a word in between hands that i couldn’t understand*) When we finished drinking one cup, men and women of the Hauria tribe rushed in noisily.



[Boss!! I haven’t seen you in a long time!!]



[We waited for you! Boss!!]



[I, I’m honored to finally meet you desu~! Sir!!]



[Uoi! Newbies! Boss has returned! Tell all the other guys! Get there in 30 seconds!]



[Yes, roger de arimasu~!]



The attitude of the leftover forces, Kouki who should have expected it already from the reaction from Pal’s group is completely surprised! He spat out*it was either spat out, or spilled* his tea. While all members were wiping off the tea, they noticed that multiple Usagininzoku were lining up! Standing upright and immoveable with heels in arrangement, it was the appearance of wonderful saluting.



Though there are many who don’t actually know Hajime, their behaviours and speech seems to have been trained into them voluntarily, and expanded their powers.



[Un~, Yes, its been a long time. Temporarily, since there are other people here lets stop the saluting]



[ [ [ [ [ [Sir, Yes, Sir!] ] ] ] ] ]



With a cheer for the boss that could be heard throughout the Sea of Trees, the Hauria tribe seemed to be very satisfied, to the genuine cheer that they’ve experienced for the first time [we’ll also finally.…..] the Usagininzoku that wasn’t part of the Hauria tribe was filled with anticipation.



Surely, after Hajime leaves the Sea of Trees, the angry voice of Sergeant HarOman *thanks, lemonedSM* might have resounded throughout the Sea of Trees.



[I’ve meet Pal’s group and understand roughly what’s going on. You guys seem to have played an active role? You’ve done a great job repelling them]



[ [ [ [ [ [Yes, We’re grateful de arimasu~!!] ] ] ] ] ]



The last reply was said full of emotion in a tearful voice. Hajime, then passed on Pal’s groups information on to the Hauria who are trembling with emotion. In other words, Having found that Cam’s group invaded the Imperial castle, they will also invade it. And, there is a request for assistance.



[Indeed. …..The message from “Baltoferd of Certain Death” has definitely been received. We express our thanks, boss]



[………….Na, by the way…..what is your second name?]



[Ha? Me? ……Fu, of course. Like the falling thunder, an unpredictable thunderclap striking down his foes, I am “Iorunikusu of the Thunder Blade” *Yeah, these lines are iffy…it probably sounds out into something, but for the life of me i don’t know*! desu~!]



[……Is that so]



It seems that it’s already too late for the Hauria tribe.They’ve been completely infected. I regret that I didn’t stop this from spreading beyond Baltoferd of Certain Death.



Hajime pulled himself together and asked “Iorunikusu of the Thunder Blade”.



[There seems to have been members outside of the Hauria tribe thats been trained, now, how many exactly?]



[……Rest assured…. Many brave young people from tribes that have good relations to our Hauria tribe have heard of the rumors and begged to be trained….. Our actual combat force goes up to 122 soldiers]



Not only Hajime, but also Yue and Shia were surprised, if thats the case then they’ve increased their numbers by a fair bit. Hajime’s intentions aren’t understood so “Iorunikusu of the Thunder Blade” has a doubtful face.



[we can carry all of the members at one time. …..Io, Runikusu. Quickly gather all the guys who want to follow us to the Imperial capital. I want to see everyone together here]



[Ha? Ha! Roger! At once!]



It appeared that “Iorunikusu of the Thunder Blade” didn’t understand right away and asked back with a questionable face, then he guessed that it meant that they would be going with Hajime to the Imperial capital, he saluted and immediately left to gather the other members.



“Io…..of the Thunder Blade, Hajime returned in order to go to the great labyrinth, it appears he didn’t think that Hajime would actually help them. It seems he shaken up by the unexpected words.



And, Io wasn’t the only one who was surprised, Shia who stood next to Hajime was also surprised. Her eyes are open wide, and her rabbit ears are standing up straight! She stares at Hajime.



[Ha, Hajime-san…..the great labyrinth…..]



[You’re worried about Cam’s group right?]



[U….that….sono….but….]



Hajime hit the bulls-eye so Shia shuts her mouth.



Hajime’s purpose is the great labyrinth, Cam’s circumstances are unrelated, Shia was unable to say that she wanted to search for Cam’s whereabouts, entering the Imperial capital which would prove too troublesome. Moreover, Cam wasn’t kidnapped, he went in on his own accord. If anything its his own responsibility.



Shia also decided to follow whatever Hajime’s decisions were. Just like her father had his own path, Shia had hers.



However, still, if you know that your family members whereabouts are unknown, naturally you would be worried and search. Because of the anxiety being shown on Shia’s face – Yue, Hajime, and the rest understood.



Hajime, walks up right beside Shia, who was quiet because she was grateful that extra time would be used, and places his hands on her cheeks.



[Fe?]



To Hajime’s sudden action, Shia absentmindedly let out a voice with a confused face. While looking straight into Shia’s eyes with persuading power, Hajime smiled and said.



[Shia, that anxious face doesn’t suit you. If you’re worried about Cam, just say you’re worried]



[B, but….]



[No buts. Now, what do you want to do? You’ve always just said whatever you wanted. What happened to your impudence from our first meeting? To begin with, if you’re not smiling….. I wont be able to contain my anger]



[Hajime-san…..]



Though it was snappishly said, it’s obvious that he worried about Shia in all truths. The words that Shia yearned for. She understood, Shia places her hand on top of Hajime’s hand thats on her cheek. Her eyes began to moisten with joy and love.



[You might not realise this……but this, sono, what. it’s enough, that i think that you’re important. Therefore, Cheer up…. I won’t hesitate to do my best]



[Hajime-san, I…..]



[Just say what you want to say. Because i will definitely listen]



With a gentle warmth transmitting to her cheek, to the eyes that looked straight back into her eyes, Shia’s words that she locked up within herself began to spring forth.



[…….I, I’m worried about father desuu~. …..Just one look is fine, I want to see his safe appearance desuu~.]



[Really, you only had to say that in the beginning. Now, did you think i would decline?]



[Wa, I, I didn’t mean for it to be like that! Mou, Hajime-san is truly annoying!]



Though she puffs her cheeks as if sulking, stars twinkled brightly in her eyes, her cheeks were dyed pink, and the face of a woman who was looking at her boyfriend was seen. To say it out, happy feelings were overflowing from her whole body.



Shia, though it was not intentional to be reserved with Hajime, due to the increase of women who thinks about Hajime(rivals), She unconsciously held back to increase her ratings.



Everything was blown away at Hajime’s words, “You’re important.”



When this Shia was seen, the women reacts.



[…..N~. Shia, cute]



And, Yue watches Shia heartwarmingly. Just like an older sister.



[I ask of you, I’ll be happy if you occasionally abuse me~]



And, Teio gave off an impression that couldn’t be anything but perverted. will there be a way to cure her serious illness.



[Uu~, how enviable~]



[well, I would be glad if the man I liked said that to me……]



[Na, Nagumo-kun…..Your very straight forward. I’ve changed my opinion of you. Suzu is shocked]
